Utah statutes.
9-8-302.   Definitions.
As used in this part and Part 4, Historic Sites:
(1)  "Agency" means a department, division, office, bureau, board, commission,
or other administrative unit of the state.
(2)  "Ancient human remains" means all or part of the following that are
historic or prehistoric:
(a)  a physical individual; and
(b)  any object on or attached to the physical individual that is placed on or
attached to the physical individual as part of the death rite or ceremony of a
culture.
(3)  "Antiquities Section" means the Antiquities Section of the Division of
State History created in Section 9-8-304.
(4)  "Archaeological resources" means all material remains and their
associations, recoverable or discoverable through excavation or survey, that
provide information pertaining to the historic or prehistoric peoples of the
state.
(5)  "Collection" means a specimen and the associated records documenting the
specimen and its recovery.
(6)  "Curation" means management and care of collections according to standard
professional museum practice, which may include inventorying, accessioning,
labeling, cataloging, identifying, evaluating, documenting, storing,
maintaining, periodically inspecting, cleaning, stabilizing, conserving,
exhibiting, exchanging, or otherwise disposing of original collections or
reproductions, and providing access to and facilities for studying
collections.
(7)  "Curation facility" is defined as provided in Section 53B-17-603.
(8)  "Division" means the Division of State History created in Section
9-8-201.
(9)  "Excavate" means the recovery of archaeological resources.
(10)  "Historic property" means any prehistoric or historic district, site,
building, structure, or specimen included in, or eligible for inclusion in,
the National Register of Historic Places or the State Register.
(11)  "Indian tribe" means a tribe, band, nation, or other organized group or
community of Indians that is recognized as eligible for the special programs
and services provided by the United States to Indians because of their status
as Indians.
(12)  "Museum" means the Utah Museum of Natural History.
(13) (a)  "Nonfederal land" means land in the state that is not owned,
controlled, or held in trust by the federal government.
(b)  "Nonfederal land" includes:
(i)  land owned or controlled by:
(A)  the state;
(B)  a county, city, or town;
(C)  an Indian tribe, if the land is not held in trust by the United States
for the Indian tribe or the Indian tribe's members; or
(D)  a person other than the federal government; or
(ii)  school and institutional trust lands.
(14)  "Principal investigator" means the individual with overall
administrative responsibility for the survey or excavation project authorized
by the permit.
(15)  "Repository" is defined as provided in Section 53B-17-603.
(16)  "School and institutional trust lands" are those properties defined in
Section 53C-1-103.
(17)  "Site" means any petroglyphs, pictographs, structural remains, or
geographic location that is the source of archaeological resources or
specimens.
(18)  "Specimen" means all man-made artifacts and remains of an archaeological
or anthropological nature found on or below the surface of the earth,
excluding structural remains.
(19)  "State historic preservation officer" means that position mentioned in
16 U.S.C. Sec. 470a, as amended.
(20) (a)  "State land" means land owned by the state including the state's:
(i)  legislative and judicial branches;
(ii)  departments, divisions, agencies, boards, commissions, councils, and
committees; and
(iii)  institutions of higher education as defined under Section 53B-3-102.
(b)  "State land" does not include:
(i)  land owned by a political subdivision of the state;
(ii)  land owned by a school district;
(iii)  private land; or
(iv)  school and institutional trust lands.
(21)  "Survey" means a surface investigation for archaeological resources that
may include:
(a)  insubstantial surface collection of archaeological resources; and
(b)  limited subsurface testing that disturbs no more of a site than is
necessary to determine the nature and extent of the archaeological resources
or whether the site is a historic property.
